Utah statutes.
53B-17-802.   Rocky Mountain Center for Occupational and Environmental Health at the university.

(1)  There is established at the University of Utah the Rocky Mountain Center for Occupational and Environmental Health, to be an occupational health and safety center for education and research.

(2)  The university shall operate the center in a manner so that the center is:

(a)  eligible to be designated as an education and research center by the National Institute for Occupational Safety and Health in the United States Department of Health and Human Services; and

(b)  a resource for affected populations to:

(i)  improve workplace health and safety; and

(ii)  contribute to economic growth and development in Utah and the surrounding region.

